Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 26.
WORKMEN’S COMPENSATION (CONST., ART. 5, § 32, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 32, and is incorporated therein. The amendment was proposed by initiative petition and was adopted at the general election on Nov. 8, 1938, by a vote of 77,028 for and 45,966 against.